Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 6 Registration of Voters
21-2-231.
Lists of persons convicted of felonies, noncitizens, mentally incompetent, and deceased persons provided to Secretary of State and Council of Superior Court Clerks; removal of names from list of electors; obtain information about deceased; timing; list of inactive voters provided to Council of Superior Court Clerks.

Unless otherwise notified by the Secretary of State, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the Secretary of State and The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia a complete list of all persons, including dates of birth, social security numbers, and other information as prescribed by the Secretary of State or The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia, who were convicted of a felony in this state since the preceding reporting period. The Secretary of State or The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia may, by agreement with the commissioner of corrections and the commissioner of community supervision, obtain criminal information relating to the conviction, sentencing, and completion of sentencing requirements of felonies. Additionally, the Secretary of State and The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia shall be authorized to obtain such criminal information relating to Georgia electors convicted of a felony in another state, if such information is available.

(a.1)

The clerk of the superior court of each county shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the Secretary of State, in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State, a complete list of all persons, including addresses, ages, and other identifying information as prescribed by the Secretary of State, who identify themselves as not being citizens of the United States during their qualification to serve as a juror during the preceding calendar month in that county.

The judge of the probate court of each county shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the Secretary of State, in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State, a complete list of all persons, including addresses, ages, and other identifying information as prescribed by the Secretary of State, who were declared mentally incompetent during the preceding calendar month in the county and whose voting rights were removed.

Upon receipt of the lists described in subsections (a.1) and (b) of this Code section, the Secretary of State shall transmit the names of such persons whose names appear on the list of electors to the appropriate county board of registrars who shall remove all such names from the list of electors and shall mail a notice of such action and the reason therefor to the last known address of such persons by first-class mail.

Upon receipt of the list described in subsection (a) of this Code section and the lists of persons convicted of felonies in federal courts received pursuant to 52 U.S.C. Section 20507(g), the Secretary of State shall transmit the names of such persons whose names appear on the lists of electors to the appropriate county board of registrars who shall mail a notice to the last known address of each such person by first-class mail, stating that the board of registrars has received information that such person has been convicted of a felony and will be removed from the list of electors 30 days after the date of the notice unless such person requests a hearing before the board of registrars on such removal.

Unless otherwise notified by the Secretary of State, the local registrar of vital statistics of each county shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the Secretary of State, in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State, a complete list of all persons, including addresses, ages, and other identifying information as prescribed by the Secretary of State, who died during the preceding calendar month in the county. The Secretary of State may, by agreement with the commissioner of public health, obtain such information from the state registrar of vital statistics. Additionally, the Secretary of State is authorized to obtain such lists of deceased Georgia electors, if possible, from other states.

Upon receipt of the lists described in subsection (d) of this Code section, the Secretary of State or his or her designated agent shall remove all such names of deceased persons from the list of electors and shall notify the registrar in the county where the deceased person was domiciled at the time of his or her death.

(e.1)

County registrars may obtain information about persons who died from obituaries published by local newspapers, death certificates, verifiable knowledge of the death, and information provided in writing and signed by a family member or members of the deceased person. County registrars shall determine if such deceased person’s name appears on the list of electors and, if so, shall remove such name from the list of electors and shall send by first class mail to the mailing address shown on the elector’s voter registration records a notice of such action and the reason therefor.

County registrars shall initiate appropriate action regarding the right of an elector to remain on the list of qualified registered voters within 60 days after receipt of the information described in this Code section. Failure to take such action may subject the registrars or the county governing authority for whom the registrars are acting to a fine by the State Election Board.

The Secretary of State shall provide to The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia not later than the last day of each month all information enumerated in subsections (b) through (d) of this Code section and Code Section 21-2-232 and a list of voters who have failed to vote and inactive voters, as identified pursuant to Code Sections 21-2-234 and 21-2-235. Such data shall only be used by the council, the council’s vendors, superior court clerks, and jury clerks for maintenance of state-wide master jury lists and county master jury lists. Such data shall be provided to the council or its vendors in the electronic format required by the council for such purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-231

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 9; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 26; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 7, 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 10; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 14; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 28/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 9/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2009, p. 327, § 1/HB 549; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 59, § 1-65/HB 415; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 19/SB 92; Ga. L. 2014, p. 451, § 9/HB 776; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-52/HB 310; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 9/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, redesignated the existing provisions of subsection (c) as paragraph (c)(1); substituted “subsections (a.1), and (b) of this Code section” for “subsections (a), (a.1) and (b) of this Code section and the lists of persons convicted of felonies in federal courts received pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1973gg-6(g)” in the middle of paragraph (c)(1); and added paragraph (c)(2).

Cross references.

Purging list by using list of persons for whom death certificates filed, § 31-10-15.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, a comma was deleted following “subsections (a.1)” in paragraph (c)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 59, § 1-1/HB 415, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Jury Composition Reform Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

U.S. Code.

The National Voter Registration Act of 1993 is codified at 42 U.S.C. Section 1973gg-7.

Section 20507 of Title 52 U.S.C., referred to in this Code section, concerns the requirements with respect to administration of voter registration.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-232.
Removal of elector’s name from list of electors.

An elector may request to have such elector’s name removed from the list of electors by making a written request to the registrars of such elector’s county of residence. Upon receipt of such request, the registrars shall remove such elector’s name from the list of electors and shall confirm such removal by written notice by first-class mail sent to the address on the elector’s registration records.

When an elector of this state moves to another state and registers to vote and the registration officials in such state send a notice of cancellation reflecting the registration of the elector in the other state, which includes a copy of such elector’s voter registration application bearing the elector’s signature, the Secretary of State or the board of registrars, as the case may be, shall remove such elector’s name from the list of electors. It shall not be necessary to send a confirmation notice to the elector in such circumstances.

When an elector of this state moves to another state and the registration officials in such other state or a nongovernmental entity as described in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-225 sends a notice of cancellation or other information indicating that the elector has moved to such state but such notice or information does not include a copy of such elector’s voter registration application in such other state bearing the elector’s signature, the Secretary of State or the board of registrars, as the case may be, shall send a confirmation notice to the elector as provided in Code Section 21-2-234.

Once becoming a member of the nongovernmental entity described in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-225, the Secretary of State shall obtain regular information from such entity regarding electors who may have moved to another state, died, or otherwise become ineligible to vote in Georgia. The Secretary of State shall use such information to conduct list maintenance on the list of eligible electors.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-232

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 10/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 17/SB 202.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “When an elector of this state moves to another county or state and registers to vote and the registration officials send a notice of cancellation reflecting the registration of the elector in the other county or state, the Secretary of State or the board of registrars, as the case may be, shall remove such elector’s name from the list of electors. It shall not be necessary to send a confirmation notice to the elector in such circumstances.”; and added paragraph (b)(2).

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added paragraph (b)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-233.
Comparison of change of address information supplied by United States Postal Service with electors list; removal from list of electors; notice to electors.

The Secretary of State is authorized to cause at his or her discretion the official list of electors to be compared to the change of address information supplied by the United States Postal Service through its licensees periodically for the purpose of identifying those electors whose addresses have changed.

If it appears from the change of address information supplied by the licensees of the United States Postal Service that an elector whose name appears on the official list of electors has moved to a different address in the county in which the elector is presently registered, the list of electors shall be changed to reflect the new address and the elector shall be sent a notice of the change by forwardable mail at the elector’s old address with a postage prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the elector may verify or correct the address information. The registrars may also send a notice of the change by forwardable mail to the elector’s new address with a postage prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the elector may verify or correct the address information.

If it appears from the change of address information supplied by the licensees of the United States Postal Service that an elector whose name appears on the official list of electors has moved to a different address outside of the boundaries of the county or municipality in which the elector is presently registered, such elector shall be sent a confirmation notice as provided in Code Section 21-2-234 at the old address of the elector. The registrars may also send a confirmation notice to the elector’s new address. If the elector confirms the change of address to an address outside of the State of Georgia, the elector’s name shall be removed from the appropriate list of electors. If the elector confirms the change of address to an address outside of the boundaries of the county or municipality in which the elector is presently registered, but still within the State of Georgia, the elector’s registration shall be transferred to the new county or municipality. The Secretary of State or the registrars shall forward the confirmation card to the registrars of the county in which the elector’s new address is located and the registrars of the county of the new address shall update the voter registration list to reflect the change of address. If the elector responds to the notice and affirms that the elector has not moved, the elector shall remain on the list of electors at the elector’s current address. If the elector fails to respond to the notice within 30 days after the date of the notice, the elector shall be transferred to the inactive list provided for in Code Section 21-2-235.

Whenever an elector’s name is removed from the list of electors by the county registrars because the elector has furnished in writing to the registrar a residence address that is located outside of the State of Georgia, the registrars shall notify the elector in writing at the elector’s new address that the elector’s name is being deleted from the list of electors.

Nothing in this Code section shall prevent the removal from the list of electors of an elector for ineligibility to vote.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-233

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 19; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 23; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 29/HB 244; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 20/SB 92; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 11/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted the former second and third sentences of subsection (d), which read: “Whenever an elector’s registration is transferred by the county registrars to another county in this state because the elector has furnished in writing to the registrar a residence address that is located in this state outside of the elector’s present county of registration in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, the registrars of the county of the elector’s former residence shall notify the elector in writing at the elector’s new address that the elector’s registration is being transferred to the new address. The registrars of the county of the elector’s new address shall provide the elector with a new registration card pursuant to Code Section 21-2-226.”

21-2-234.
Electors who have failed to vote and with whom there has been no contact in three years; confirmation notice requirements and procedure; time for completion of list maintenance activities.

As used in this Code section and Code Section 21-2-235, the term “no contact” shall mean that the elector has not filed an updated voter registration card, has not filed a change of name or address, has not signed a petition which is required by law to be verified by the election superintendent of a county or municipality or the Secretary of State, has not signed a voter’s certificate, has not submitted an absentee ballot application or voted an absentee ballot, and has not confirmed the elector’s continuation at the same address during the preceding five calendar years.

In the first six months of each odd-numbered year, the Secretary of State shall identify all electors whose names appear on the list of electors with whom there has been no contact during the preceding five calendar years and who were not identified as changing addresses under Code Section 21-2-233. The confirmation notice described in this Code section shall be sent to each such elector during each odd-numbered year. Such notices shall be sent by forwardable, first-class mail.

When mailings to electors whose names appear on the list of electors, including, but not limited to, acknowledgments under Code Section 21-2-226, are returned undeliverable by the United States Postal Service, the confirmation notice described in this Code section shall be sent to such electors.

The confirmation notice shall be a postage prepaid, preaddressed return card on which an elector may state such elector’s current address and which also includes a notice which states substantially the following:

If the elector has not changed addresses or has changed addresses within the county or municipality in which the elector is currently registered, the elector must return the card with the updated information, if any, within 30 days after the date of the notice; and

If the card is not returned within 30 days after the date of the notice, the elector’s name shall be transferred to the inactive list of electors provided for in Code Section 21-2-235.

If the elector returns the card and shows that he or she has changed residence to a place outside of the State of Georgia, the elector’s name shall be removed from the appropriate list of electors. If the elector confirms his or her change of address to an address outside of the boundaries of the county or municipality in which the elector is currently registered, but still within the State of Georgia, the elector’s registration shall be transferred to the new county or municipality. The Secretary of State or the registrars shall forward the confirmation card to the registrars of the county in which the elector’s new address is located, and the registrars of the county of the new address shall update the voter registration list to reflect the change of address.

If the elector returns the card and states that the elector has changed residences within the county or municipality in which the elector is currently registered, the elector shall remain on the list of electors, the registration records shall be corrected to reflect such new address, and a new voter identification card shall be issued pursuant to Code Section 21-2-226.

If such elector returns the card and confirms that such elector continues to reside at the current address at which such elector is registered, the fact of such confirmation shall be recorded and the elector shall remain on the list of electors.

If the elector fails to return the card within 30 days after the date of the notice, the elector shall be transferred to the inactive list provided for in Code Section 21-2-235.

Nothing in this Code section shall prevent the removal from the list of electors of an elector for ineligibility to vote.

List maintenance activities pursuant to this Code section and Code Section 21-2-233 shall be completed not later than 90 days prior to a general primary or general election for federal offices or a presidential preference primary. This subsection shall not apply to notices sent pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-234

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 649, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 12/HB 268; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 11/HB 316.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: “If the elector returns the card and shows that he or she has changed residence to a place outside of the boundaries of the county or municipality in which the elector is currently registered, the elector’s name shall be removed from the appropriate list of electors and information shall be sent to the elector explaining how the elector can continue to be eligible to vote.”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “five” for “three” near the end of paragraph (a)(1) and in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(2) and inserted “has not submitted an absentee ballot application or voted an absentee ballot,” in the middle of paragraph (a)(1).

Law reviews.

For article, “Black and White Make Gray: Common Cause v. Kemp, What’s the Trigger for Purging Voters?,” see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 947 (2018).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For comment, “Voter Suppression Post-

Shelby

: Impacts and Issues of Voter Purge and Voter ID Laws,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 857 (2020).

21-2-235.
Inactive list of electors.

In addition to the official list of electors, the Secretary of State shall also maintain an inactive list of electors. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the names of electors on the inactive list of electors shall not be counted in computing the number of ballots required for an election, the number of voting devices needed for a precinct, the number of electors required to divide or constitute a precinct, or the number of signatures needed on any petition. However, any elector whose name appears on the inactive list shall be eligible to sign a petition and such petition signature, if valid and regardless of the validity of the petition as a whole, shall be sufficient to return the elector to the official list of electors if the elector still resides at the address listed on the elector’s registration records and shall be grounds to proceed under Code Section 21-2-234 to confirm the change of address of the elector if the elector provides a different address from the address which appears on the elector’s registration records.

An elector placed on the inactive list of electors shall remain on such list until the day after the second November general election held after the elector is placed on the inactive list of electors. If the elector makes no contact, as defined in Code Section 21-2-234, during that period, the elector shall be removed from the inactive list of electors. Not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the date on which the elector is to be removed from the inactive list of electors, the board of registrars shall mail a notice to the address on the elector’s registration record.

An elector whose name is on the inactive list of electors may vote:

If the elector has not changed residences, at the polling place of such elector’s last address upon affirming in writing that such elector still resides at the address shown on such elector’s registration records;

If the elector has moved to an address within the county in the same precinct, such elector may vote at the polling place of such elector’s last address upon affirming in writing that such elector resides in the county by completing a change of address card affirming the new address within the county; or

If the elector has moved to an address within the county or municipality in a different precinct, such elector may vote at the polling place of such elector’s last address, for that election and any runoffs resulting from such election only, upon affirming in writing that such elector still resides in the county or municipality and completing a change of address card affirming the new address within the county or municipality.

If an elector whose name appears on the inactive list of electors appears at the polls and votes as provided under subsection (c) of this Code section, the board of registrars shall transfer the elector’s name back to the official list of electors and shall make any necessary corrections in the elector’s registration records.

In addition to the official list of electors provided to each polling place, there shall also be provided an inactive list of electors.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-235

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 649, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 24; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 13/HB 540; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 12/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, added the third sentence of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Opening of public records to inspection by members of public generally, §

50-18-70

.

21-2-236.
Periods of retention of registration cards, applications, and records of list maintenance activities; rules and regulations regarding safekeeping and maintenance of electronic records.

The voter registration cards of electors whose names appear on either the official list of electors or the list of inactive electors shall be retained on file as long as the elector remains on such lists and for a period of two years following the removal from the lists; provided, however, that an original voter registration card may be destroyed if an image of the face of the card is stored electronically.

The registration applications of persons whose applications were rejected and all related material and records, or electronic facsimiles thereof, shall be retained on file for a period of two years after the date of the rejection.

All records concerning list maintenance activities under Code Sections 21-2-233 and 21-2-234 shall be maintained for a period of two years and shall be available for public inspection and copying, except to the extent that such records relate to a declination to register to vote or to the identity of a voter registration agency through which any particular elector is registered. Such records shall contain the name and address of all electors to whom confirmation notices are sent and information concerning whether each such elector has responded to such notice.

The State Election Board shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the safekeeping and maintenance of electronic records of voter registration records maintained under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-236

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 21/SB 92.

Cross references.

Maintenance and disposition of public records generally, §

50-18-90

et seq.